District of Columbia statutes.
24-1106

Right to alter, amend, or repeal provisions.

The right to alter, amend, or repeal this chapter is expressly reserved by the Congress.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 666, Pub. L. 91-358, title IV, § 406

History

1981 Ed., § 32-1106.
1973 Ed., § 32-1106.

Prior Codifications